Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska88-547.02
Judicial proceeding; notice required.

Prior to or within ten days after any creditor of the warehouse licensee commences a judicial proceeding to reduce to judgment, foreclose, or otherwise enforce any claim on a creditor's lien or security interest attached to grain contained in the warehouse, the creditor shall serve written notice on the executive director of the commission.

Laws 2005, LB 492, § 4.